src/fst/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON pronoun_neut
+Pron: # ;

LEXICON Pron_1Sg
+Pron+1Sg+Nom:aš ;
+Pron+1Sg+Gen:manęs ;
+Pron+1Sg+Dat:man ;
+Pron+1Sg+Acc:mane ;
+Pron+1Sg+Ins:manimi ;
+Pron+1Sg+Loc:manyje ;
+Pron+1Sg+Poss:mano ;

LEXICON Pron_2Sg
+Pron+2Sg+Nom:tu ;
+Pron+2Sg+Gen:tavęs ;
+Pron+2Sg+Dat:tau ;
+Pron+2Sg+Acc:tave ;
+Pron+2Sg+Ins:tavimi ;
+Pron+2Sg+Loc:tavyje ;
+Pron+2Sg+Poss:tavo ;

LEXICON Pron_3Sg_M
+Pron+3Sg+Msc+Nom:jis ;
+Pron+3Sg+Msc+Gen:jo ;
+Pron+3Sg+Msc+Dat:jam ;
+Pron+3Sg+Msc+Acc:jį ;
+Pron+3Sg+Msc+Ins:juo ;
+Pron+3Sg+Msc+Loc:jame ;

LEXICON Pron_3Sg_F
+Pron+3Sg+Fem+Nom:ji ;
+Pron+3Sg+Fem+Gen:jos ;
+Pron+3Sg+Fem+Dat:jai ;
+Pron+3Sg+Fem+Acc:ją ;
+Pron+3Sg+Fem+Ins:ja ;
+Pron+3Sg+Fem+Loc:joje ;

LEXICON Pron_1Pl
+Pron+1Pl+Nom:mes ;
+Pron+1Pl+Gen:mūsų ;
+Pron+1Pl+Dat:mums ;
+Pron+1Pl+Acc:mus ;
+Pron+1Pl+Ins:mumis ;
+Pron+1Pl+Loc:mumyse ;

LEXICON Pron_2Pl
+Pron+2Pl+Nom:jūs ;
+Pron+2Pl+Gen:jūsų ;
+Pron+2Pl+Dat:jums ;
+Pron+2Pl+Acc:jus ;
+Pron+2Pl+Ins:jumis ;
+Pron+2Pl+Loc:jumyse ;

LEXICON Pron_3Pl_M
+Pron+3Pl+Msc+Nom:jie ;
+Pron+3Pl+Msc+Gen:jų ;
+Pron+3Pl+Msc+Dat:jiems ;
+Pron+3Pl+Msc+Acc:juos ;
+Pron+3Pl+Msc+Ins:jais ;
+Pron+3Pl+Msc+Loc:juose ;

LEXICON Pron_3Pl_F
+Pron+3Pl+Fem+Nom:jos ;
+Pron+3Pl+Fem+Gen:jų ;
+Pron+3Pl+Fem+Dat:joms ;
+Pron+3Pl+Fem+Acc:jas ;
+Pron+3Pl+Fem+Ins:jomis ;
+Pron+3Pl+Fem+Loc:jose ;

LEXICON pron_inter
+Pron+Int+Nom:as # ;
+Pron+Int+Gen:o # ;
+Pron+Int+Dat:am # ;
+Pron+Int+Acc:ą # ;
+Pron+Int+Ins:uo # ;
+Pron+Int+Loc:ame # ;

! Lexc Test
!!€gt-desc: pronoun_test
!!€ aš:     aš+Pron+1Sg+Nom
!!€ jus:    jūs+Pron+2Pl+Acc
!!€ jose:   jos+Pron+Fem+3Pl+Loc
