src/fst/stems/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON Pronouns
aš: Pron_1Sg ;
tu: Pron_2Sg ;
jis: Pron_3Sg_M ;
ji: Pron_3Sg_F ;
mes: Pron_1Pl ;
jūs: Pron_2Pl ;
jie: Pron_3Pl_M ;
jos: Pron_3Pl_F ;
tai pronoun_neut ;
t pron_inter ;
k pron_inter ;
